static/hunspell/05.11.2023/udm.dic
бадӟын/A1N1O3
сэрго/A1N1O3
пална/B1O3
ӵошин/B1O3
ваннапалан/D1O3
выннапалан/D1O3
ваннапаллан/D1O3
неправельно/D3O3
Мистершмитт/F1O3
моння/M1D1O3
монням/M1D1O3
минням/M1D1O3
кӧӵе/A1N1M1O3
будӟиннал/N1O3
будӟыннал/N1O3
гадён/N1O3
ваннапал/N1O3
ӟытпал/N1O3
колбас/N1O3
ӟегыт/N1O3# Маша
ӟигит/N1O3# Маша
чоски/N1O3
почош/N1O3& = почаш
пушмоли/N1O3& = пушмульы
аналгин/N1R1O3
аркар/N1R1O3
бланка/N1R1O3
ветпершал/N1R1O3
влагалища/N1R1O3
декхан/N1R1O3
дерёвня/N1R1O3
десятин/N1R1O3
долготтё/N1R1O3
жикет/N1R1O3
заседанья/N1R1O3
зимородка/N1R1O3
змеёк/N1R1O3
именина/N1R1O3
калва/N1R1O3
кастрюль/N1R1O3
кестэн/N1R1O3
кестэнэ/N1R1O3
колишной/N1R1O3
коньымус/N1R1O3
крачки/N1R1O3
крепдошин/N1R1O3
кукшин/N1R1O3
ляриги/N1R1O3
магистрал/N1R1O3
музкан/N1R1O3
нефта/N1R1O3
обезьяна/N1R1O3
образованья/N1R1O3
огуреч/N1R1O3
панцырь/N1R1O3
партманет/N1R1O3
пасонка/N1R1O3
полыштоп/N1R1O3
празеодим/N1R1O3
протуар/N1R1O3
протэз/N1R1O3
пузыр/N1R1O3
пузырок/N1R1O3
пыромыс/N1R1O3
разор/N1R1O3
самар/N1R1O3
сельтра/N1R1O3
сигуранцы/N1R1O3
социализ/N1R1O3
спектакыль/N1R1O3
ткемаль/N1R1O3
тракта/N1R1O3
тявки/N1R1O3
фабрик/N1R1O3
фершал/N1R1O3
фрукт/N1R1O3
цикория/N1R1O3
ӵашша/N1R1O3
чоска/N1R1O3
чугын/N1R1O3
шишь/N1R1O3
электыр/N1R1O3
эспер/N1R1O3
негра/N1O3
финно-угор/N1R3O3
дари/N1A1P1
бык/N1A1P1
зэм/N1A1D1P1
кем/N1D1P1
яра/N1P1
секта/N1P1
эке/N1P1
ни/N1P1
вай/N1P1
шай/N1P1
ыкы/N1P1
шоры/N1P1
станчия/N3O3
эксплоатация/N3O3
визь/N9
йырвизь/N9N1
ин/N9
син/N9
вылэм/P1
что/P1
я-ка/P1
о-о/P1
ну-ка/P1
ай/P1
айда/P1
нёшто/P1
неужто/P1
эйла/P1
шол/P1
тожо/P1
эшшо/P1
зира/P1
зэмзэ/P1
вообще/P1
ваньмыз-ӧвӧлэз/P1
айбат/P1
ичизэ/P1
абба/P1
адске/P1
айко/P1
акак/P1
акры/P1
акыр/P1A1
алай/P1
аминь/P1
арна/P1
ась/P1
ауал/P1
бен/P1
бо/P1
бон/P1
бугай/P1
буди/P1
быгай/P1
быри-быри/P1
вае/P1
ваелэ/P1
вай-ка/P1
ведь/P1
веть/P1
во/P1
вот/P1
всё-таки/P1
вылды/P1
гетэ/P1
гитэ/P1
гой/P1
гынэк/P1
давай/P1
даже/P1
дай/P1
дак/P1
драк/P1
етэ/P1
еще/P1
ӝык/P1
замлакаш/P1
занглакаш/P1
ӟан-ӟан/P1
ӟечбур/P1
ӟечбуресь/P1
ӟечесь/P1A1
ӟечесь-буресь/P1
ӟечом-буром/P1
и/P1
ик/P1
индэ/P1
ини/P1
иське/P1
как/P1
кемзэ/P1D1
керек/P1A1N1
керет/P1A1N1
керо/P1
коркапуш/P1
коть/P1
кылсярысь/P1
ла/P1
лабаса/P1
ло/P1
луоз/P1
луэмен/P1
лык/P1
лэся/P1
марошлы/P1
машшары/P1
марым/P1
ме/P1
меда/P1
медад/P1
медаз/P1
медак/P1
медам/P1
медло/P1
медось/P1
мелэ/P1
мия/P1
на/P1
небось/P1
незнай/P1
неужели/P1
о/P1
о-веть/P1
ого/P1I1
ӧзтэ/P1
ойдолэ/P1
окмоз/P1D1
око/P1
оло-керек/P1
оло-но/P1
о-о-ведь/P1
ӧвӧнь/P1
ӧвӧл/P1A1N1
осто/P1
остэ/P1
отэ/P1
пе/P1
погоди/P1
поди/P1
пожалуй/P1
пожалуйста/P1
пӧй/P1
привет/P1
пук/P1
пытсо/P1
ракмат/P1
сётаки/P1
сябась/P1
тани/P1
тани-тани/P1
тау/P1
таулэ/P1
тауэлэ/P1
тӥни/P1
тӥнь/P1
тӥни-тани/P1
то/P1
то-то/P1
тото/P1
тямысмос/P1
угой/P1
угось/P1
ук/P1
уске/P1
чӧк/P1
ӵок/P1
чырккемесь/P1
шат/P1
шӧдске/P1
шуом/P1
ы-ы/P1I1
эн/P1
эсь/P1
э-э/P1I1
ява/P1
явалэ/P1
яватэ/P1
ялэ/P1
ялэ-ка/P1
яралоз/P1
ярам/P1
ятэ/P1
я-я/P1
инде/P1
ишь/P1
неушто/P1
оветь/P1
ӧвӧлнагес/P1
ужото/P1
чалелэ/P1
сё/P1
же/P1
пока/P1
почти/P1
якобы/P1
конечно/P1
конешно/P1O3
значит/P1
вовсе/P1
вовсё/P1
чтобы/P1
потому/P1
тоже/P1
наконец/P1
бы/P1
все-таки/P1
примерно/P1
давайте/P1
ничё/P1
кранты/P1
эске/P1# = иське
мать-перемать/P1
ёптыргин/P1
олошай/P1
олошайзэ/P1
Норья/T1N1O3
Халды/T1N1O3
Бобья-Уча/T1N1O3
Воложикья/T1N1O3
Альцы/T1N1O3
Рысан/T1N1O3
Сурдо/T1N1O3
Шмыки/T2N1O3
Гуртлудчик/T2N1O3
Берестово/T2N1O3
Патраки/T2N1O3
Волка/T2N1O3
Бородули/T2N1O3
Кулаево/T2N1O3
Гольфштрем/T3N1O3
Казакстан/T5N1O3
александыровской/T7N1O3
сялскыны/V1O3
мертскыны/V1O3
придирачкыны/V1O3
кичкыны/V1O3
сичкыны/V1O3
мычкыны/V1O3
лззькыны/V1O3
бышкылӥськыны/V1O3
пуктылӥськыны/V1O3
сылалтӥськыны/V1O3
геройяськыны/V1O3
оградъяськыны/V1O3
асэрказъяськыны/V1O3
паймемъяськыны/V1O3
эскеремъяськыны/V1O3
пӧръяськыны/V1O3
кӧттырмосъяськыны/V1O3
гадьяськыны/V1O3
ӵошкалыны/V1O3
мычкылыны/V1O3
тунсыкъяськылыны/V1O3
вырзьылыны/V1O3
сюбегатыны/V1O3
ужбергатыны/V1O3
быӵкалтыны/V1O3
сыналтыны/V1O3
пазьгытыны/V1O3
гожтӥськытыны/V1O3
пушмытыны/V1O3
провалитьтыны/V1O3
забытьтыны/V1O3
четчыны/V1O3
адашыны/V1O3
нюлэсаны/V2O3
